Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1000.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "practice of psychology" in section 2 of the act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act:* * *"Collaborative relationship" means a cooperative working relationship between a prescribing psychologist and the patient's primary care provider in the provision of patient care, including cooperation in the management and delivery of 12345678910111213141516171819202122 physical and mental health care to ensure optimal patient care.* * *"Controlled substance" means a controlled substance as defined in section 2(b) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as "The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.""Drug" means a drug as defined in section 2(b) of "The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."* * *"Practice of psychology" [means offering to render or rendering to individuals, corporations, institutions, governmental agencies, or the public for remuneration any service involving the following:(i) The application of established principles of learning, motivation, perception, thinking, and emotional relationships to problems of personality evaluation, group relations, and behavior adjustment. The application of said principles includes, but is not restricted to, counseling and the use of psychological methods with persons or groups with adjustment problems in the areas of work, family, school, and personal relationships; measuring and testing of personality, intelligence, aptitudes, and emotions, and offering services as a psychological consultant. Psychologists with appropriate education, training and experience may diagnose and use psychological methods in the treatment of a mental, emotional or nervous illness or disability; alcoholism and other substance abuse; disorders of habit or conduct; psychological aspects of physical illness, accident, injury or disability; and psychoeducational evaluation, therapy, remediation and consultation.20250HB1000PN2171 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) (a) "Measuring and testing," consisting of the psychological assessment and evaluation of abilities, attitudes, aptitudes, achievements, adjustments, motives, personality dynamics and/or other psychological attributes of individuals, or groups of individuals by means of standardized measurements or other methods, techniques or procedures recognized by the science and profession of psychology, (b) "psychological methods," consisting of the application of principles of learning and motivation in an interpersonal situation with the objectives of modification of perception and adjustment, and requiring highly developed skills in the disciplines, techniques, and methods of altering through learning processes, attitudes, feelings, values, self-concept, personal goals and adaptive patterns, (c) "psychological consulting," consisting of interpreting or reporting upon scientific fact or theory in psychology, rendering expert psychological opinion, psychological evaluation, or engaging in applied psychological research.] means rendering or offering to render, to individuals, corporations, institutions, governmental agencies or the public, for remuneration, a service involving any of the following:(1) The application of established principles of learning, motivation, perception, thinking and emotional relationships to problems of personality evaluation, group relations and behavior adjustment. The application of the established principles includes:(i) Counseling and the use of psychological methods with persons or groups with adjustment problems in the areas of work, family, school and personal relationships.(ii) Measuring and testing personality, intelligence, 20250HB1000PN2171 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 aptitudes and emotions and offering services as a psychological consultant.(2) Measuring and testing, consisting of the psychological assessment and evaluation of abilities, attitudes, aptitudes, achievements, adjustments, motives, personality dynamics or other psychological attributes of individuals or groups of individuals by means of standardized measurements or other methods, techniques or procedures recognized by the science and profession of psychology.(3) Psychological methods, consisting of the application of principles of learning and motivation in an interpersonal situation with the objectives of modification of perception and adjustment, and requiring highly developed skills in the disciplines, techniques and methods of altering through learning processes, attitudes, feelings, values, self-concept, personal goals and adaptive patterns.(4) Psychological consulting, consisting of interpreting or reporting upon scientific fact or theory in psychology, rendering expert psychological opinion, psychological evaluation or engaging in applied psychological research."Prescribing psychologist" means a psychologist licensed in this Commonwealth who holds a current valid prescription certificate."Prescription" means a written or oral order for a drug, laboratory test, medicine, device or treatment, including a controlled substance."Prescription certificate" means a document issued by the board that permits the holder to prescribe a drug or controlled substance in accordance with section 6.1."Prescriptive authority" means, pertaining only to a 20250HB1000PN2171 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prescribing psychologist, the authority to prescribe, administer, manage, discontinue or distribute, without charge, psychotropic medication. The term includes the authority of a prescribing psychologist to check a patient's pulse, blood pressure and temperature and order bloodwork."Primary care provider" means a primary care provider as defined in section 2102 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as "The Insurance Company Law of 1921.""Psychopharmacology clinical practical experience" means a period of supervised clinical training and practice in which clinical diagnoses and interventions employing medication are learned and which are conducted and supervised as part of the training program."Psychotropic medication" means a drug or controlled substance that is used for mental health disorders and substance abuse disorders, including an antidepressant, anti-anxiety medication, stimulant, antipsychotic, mood stabilizer, opioid antagonist or opioid partial agonist for the treatment of drug addiction or prevention of relapse of drug addiction, or both."Telemedicine" means as follows:(1) The delivery of health care services to a patient by a health care provider who is at a different location through synchronous interactions, asynchronous interactions or remote patient monitoring that meet the requirements of any of the following:(i) The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936).(ii) The Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (Public Law 111-5, 123 Stat. 226-279 and 467-497).20250HB1000PN2171 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Other applicable Federal or State law regarding the privacy and security of electronic transmission of health information.(2) The term does not include:(i) The provision of health care services solely through the use of voicemail, facsimile, email or instant messaging or a combination thereof.(ii) A provider-to-provider consultation.Section 2. Sections 3.1(a) and 3.2 of the act are amended to read:Section 3.1. State Board of Psychology.--(a) The State Board of Psychology shall consist of [nine] 11 members who are citizens of the United States and who have been residents of this Commonwealth for a three-year period. [Eight] Ten members are to be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate, and the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs shall serve as the [ninth] eleventh member of the board. Two members shall be appointed as representatives of the public at large. [Six] Eight members shall be appointed who shall hold current valid licenses to practice psychology in this Commonwealth and shall be broadly representative of the practice areas of psychology, and at least two members shall be prescribing psychologists.* * *Section 3.2. Powers of the Board.--The board shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To pass upon the qualifications and fitness of applicants for licenses and reciprocal licenses; and to adopt and revise rules and regulations requiring applicants to pass 20250HB1000PN2171 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 examinations relating to their qualifications as a prerequisite to the issuance of license.(2) To adopt and, from time to time, revise such rules and regulations and policies not inconsistent with the law as may be necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this act. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, standards for professional practice and a code of ethics for psychologists in the State.(3) To examine for, deny, approve, issue, revoke, suspend, restrict, limit and renew the licenses of psychologist applicants and prescribing psychologists pursuant to this act and to conduct hearings in connection therewith.(4) To conduct hearings upon complaints concerning violations of the provisions of and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this act and cause the prosecution, impose civil penalties and enjoin any such violations.(5) To employ, with the approval of the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs, a professional credentials evaluator to review applications.(6) To waive examination and grant a license in cases deemed exceptional by the board and in accordance with board regulations.(7) To keep a list of prescribing psychologists containing the following information:(i) The name of the psychologist.(ii) The psychologist's identification number assigned by the board.(iii) The psychologist's Drug Enforcement Agency number.(iv) The effective date that a prescribing psychologist obtained prescriptive authority.20250HB1000PN2171 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 6.1. Prescription Certificate.--(a) To qualify for a prescription certificate, a psychologist shall hold a current valid license in this Commonwealth and meet the minimum requirements as prescribed by the board. At a minimum, the requirements shall include:(1) A current valid doctoral level license to practice psychology in this Commonwealth.(2) A master's degree in clinical psychopharmacology from an accredited institution of higher education accredited by the American Psychological Association or that is approved by the board as meeting the necessary requirements in accordance with the following:(i) The accredited institution of higher education that offers the master's degree shall determine the prerequisites for the biomedical education which are sufficient to ensure the necessary knowledge and skills to prescribe drugs and controlled substances in a safe manner.(ii) The psychologist must have completed an organized sequence of study in an organized program offering intensive didactic education, including the following coursework and core areas of instruction:(A) Basic science.(B) Functional neurosciences.(C) Physical examination.(D) Interpretation of laboratory tests.(E) Pathological basis of disease.(F) Clinical medicine.(G) Clinical neurotherapeutics.(H) Systems of care.20250HB1000PN2171 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) Pharmacology.(J) Clinical pharmacology.(K) Psychopharmacology.(L) Psychopharmacology research.(M) Professional ethical and legal issues.(iii) The didactic portion of the education under this clause shall consist of an appropriate number of hours to ensure acquisition of the necessary knowledge and skills to prescribe in a safe and effective manner.(3) Completing a psychopharmacology clinical practical experience, as determined by the training program, which shall consist of:(i) An eighty-hour practicum in observational clinical assessment and pathophysiology under the supervision of a licensed physician or prescribing psychologist.(ii) A supervised practicum of at least four hundred hours treating at least one hundred patients with mental health disorders, under the supervision of a licensed physician or prescribing psychologist with one-to-one supervision provided either face-to-face, telephonically or by video conference.(4) Passing a national certification examination developed by a nationally recognized body and approved by the board.(5) Possessing professional liability insurance that covers the prescribing of psychotropic medication.(6) Paying all appropriate fees in the amount determined by the board.(7) Meeting any other standards or requirements deemed necessary by the board.(b) A prescribing psychologist from another state or jurisdiction, or who has training from the United States 20250HB1000PN2171 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Defense demonstration project or other similar program developed and operated by any branch of the armed forces of the United States, may apply for a prescription certificate in this Commonwealth if the board deems the education and psychopharmacology clinical practical experience equivalent to the requirements of this section. The board may, at its discretion, require the applicant to complete supplemental education or psychopharmacology clinical practical experience, or both.(c) The board shall prescribe by regulation the procedures for renewing a prescription certificate. Each prescribing psychologist shall complete a minimum of an additional sixteen hours of continuing medical education or continuing education per renewal period relevant to the practice of a prescribing psychologist. The continuing education credits are in addition to credits required to renew a psychologist license.Section 6.2. Prescribing and Administrative Practices.--(a) A prescribing psychologist may:(1) Prescribe psychotropic medication through the use of telemedicine.(2) Prescribe and administer psychotropic medication, including the ordering and review of laboratory tests in conjunction with the prescription, for the treatment and management of mental disorders and substance abuse disorders.(b) (1) When prescribing psychotropic medication to a patient, the prescribing psychologist shall maintain an ongoing collaborative relationship with the primary care provider who oversees the patient's general medical care to ensure that:(i) Necessary medical examinations are conducted.(ii) The psychotropic medication is appropriate for the 20250HB1000PN2171 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 patient's medical condition.(iii) Significant changes in the patient's medical or psychological conditions are discussed and monitored.(2) The ongoing collaborative relationship under clause (1) shall be maintained in accordance with guidelines approved by the board, which shall optimize patient care. The guidelines shall ensure that the prescribing psychologist and the primary care provider coordinate and collaborate on the care of the patient to provide optimal care.(c) A prescribing psychologist of a patient shall obtain a release of information from the patient or the patient's legal guardian authorizing the prescribing psychologist to contact the patient's primary care provider, as required by law. If the legal guardian of a patient under fourteen years of age refuses to sign a release of information for the patient's primary care provider who oversees the patient, the prescribing psychologist shall:(1) Inform the patient's legal guardian that the prescribing psychologist cannot treat the patient pharmacologically without an ongoing collaborative relationship with the patient's primary care provider.(2) Refer the patient to the primary care provider.(d) A prescribing psychologist may not issue a prescription unless the prescribing psychologist holds a current valid certificate for prescriptive authority. A prescribing psychologist may not prescribe a narcotic, except an opioid antagonist or opioid partial agonist approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of drug addiction or the prevention of relapse of drug addiction, or both.20250HB1000PN2171 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Each prescription issued by a prescribing psychologist shall:(1) Comply with all applicable Federal and State laws and regulations.(2) Be identified as written by the prescribing psychologist in a manner determined by the board.(3) Be maintained in the patient's record.(f) A prescribing psychologist may not delegate the authority to prescribe to any other person.Section 6.3. Controlled Substances.--When authorized to prescribe controlled substances, a prescribing psychologist shall file with the board in a timely manner the prescribing psychologist's Drug Enforcement Agency registration and number.Section 4. Sections 8(a)(7), (10) and (13) and (b)(6), 8.1 and 11 of the act are amended to read:Section 8. Refusal, Suspension or Revocation of License.--(a) The board may refuse to issue a license or may suspend, revoke, limit or restrict a license or reprimand a licensee for any of the following reasons:* * *(7) Having a license to practice psychology or prescription certificate suspended, revoked or refused or receiving other disciplinary action by the proper psychology licensing authority of another state, territory or country.* * *(10) Knowingly aiding, assisting, procuring or advising any unlicensed person to practice psychology or practice as a prescribing psychologist, contrary to this act or regulations of the board.* * *20250HB1000PN2171 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) Failing to perform any statutory obligation placed upon a licensed psychologist or prescribing psychologist.* * *(b) When the board finds that the license or application for license of any person may be refused, revoked, restricted or suspended under the terms of subsection (a), the board may:* * *(6) Restore a suspended license to practice psychology or prescribing psychologist and impose any disciplinary or corrective measure which it might originally have imposed.* * *Section 8.1. Reporting of Multiple Licensure.--Any licensed psychologist of this Commonwealth who is also licensed to practice psychology, is a prescribing psychologist or another health profession in any other state, territory or country shall report this information to the board on the biennial registration application. Any disciplinary action taken in any other state, territory or country shall be reported to the board on the biennial registration application or within ninety days of disposition, whichever is sooner. Multiple licensure shall be noted by the board on the psychologist's or prescribing psychologist's record, and such state, territory or country shall be notified by the board of any disciplinary actions taken against said psychologist in this Commonwealth.Section 11. Penalties and Injunctions Against Unlawful Practice.--(a) Any person who engages or offers to engage in the practice of psychology or prescribing psychologist without holding a currently valid license or prescription certificate as required by this act or any person or the responsible officer or employe of any corporation or partnership, institution or 20250HB1000PN2171 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 association who violates any of the provisions of this act or any rule or regulation of the board promulgated pursuant thereto, for a first offense shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or undergo imprisonment of not more than six months; and on each additional offense shall be subject to a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisonment of not less than six months nor more than one year, or both.(b) In addition to any other civil remedy or criminal penalty provided for in this act, the board, by a vote of the majority of the maximum number of the authorized membership of the board as provided by law, or by a vote of the majority of the duly qualified and confirmed membership or a minimum of four members, whichever is greater, may levy a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) on any current licensee who violates any provision of this act or on any person who practices psychology or practices as a prescribing psychologist, as defined in this act, without being properly licensed or certified to do so under this act. The board shall levy this penalty only after affording the accused party the opportunity for a hearing, as provided by Title 2 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes (relating to administrative law and procedure). All fines and civil penalties imposed in accordance with this act shall be paid into the Professional Augmentation Account.(c) It shall be unlawful for any person to practice or attempt to offer to practice psychology or practice as a prescribing psychologist, as defined in this act, without having at the time of so doing a valid, unexpired, unrevoked and 20250HB1000PN2171 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unsuspended license issued under this act. The unlawful practice of psychology or practice as a prescribing psychologist, as defined in this act, may be enjoined by the courts on petition of the board or the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs. In any such proceeding it shall not be necessary to show that any person is individually injured by the actions complained of. If the respondent is found guilty of the unlawful practice of psychology or practice as a prescribing psychologist, the court shall enjoin him or her from so practicing unless and until he or she has been duly licensed. Procedure in such cases shall be the same as in any other injunction suit. The remedy by injunction hereby given is in addition to any other civil or criminal prosecution and punishment.Section 5. The State Board of Psychology shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this act no later than one year from the effective date of this section.Section 6. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:Section 5 of this act.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1000PN2171 - 15 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223